Idaho, session 2026, S1318.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 4, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-467, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-467. AUDIT OF REFUGEE RESETTLEMENT. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Entity" means any corporation and foreign corporation; business
corporation and foreign business corporation; for-profit and nonprofit
unincorporated association; corporation sole; business trust, estate,
partnership, trust, and two (2) or more persons having a joint or com-
mon economic interest; and state, the United States, and foreign gov-
ernment.
(b) "Illegal alien" means a person who has overstayed the person's visa
or entered the United States without authorization irrespective of any
temporary status the person may have been granted by the department
of homeland security allowing the person to be present in the United
States.
(c) "Refugee" means any person who is outside any country of such per-
son's nationality or, in the case of a person having no nationality, is
outside any country in which such person last habitually resided, and
who is unable or unwilling to return to, and is unable or unwilling to
avail himself of the protection of, that country because of persecution
or a well-founded fear of persecution on account of race, religion, na-
tionality, membership in a particular social group, or political opin-
ion.
(d) "Resettlement services" means any service provided by an entity
that entered into a grant, contract, or cooperative agreement with the
United States department of state or other appropriate federal agency
to provide for the reception and initial placement of refugees in the
United States.
(2) Any entity incorporated under the laws of the state of Idaho pro-
viding resettlement services for refugees shall provide the legislature an
annual audit of such services in accordance with the provisions of sections
67-466 and 67-705, Idaho Code.
(3) Such audit shall detail the following:
(a) The total number of refugees served;
(b) The nationality and gender of refugees served;
(c) The language abilities of refugees served;


(d) The successful rate of participation in language remediation pro-
gramming for refugees served;
(e) The counties and municipalities where refugees served are housed;
(f) The housing units taken by refugees served; and
(g) The vital statistics, including the rates of communicable disease,
among refugees served.
(4) Any entity incorporated under the laws of the state of Idaho pro-
viding resettlement services for refugees is prohibited from aiding illegal
aliens or released aliens awaiting removal.
(5) Any entity providing refugee resettlement services that has pro-
vided assistance to illegal aliens shall account for the names and identi-
fying demographics of such aliens for the purposes of providing a catalog of
names that may be matched against federal immigration databases at the de-
partment of homeland security, department of health and human services, and
department of state.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.